Utah statutes.
19-6-506.   Schedule of fees -- Classification of property -- Collection of
delinquent fees.
(1) (a)  The governing body of any public entity may by ordinance or
resolution establish a schedule of fees to be imposed and assessed on property
within its jurisdiction the revenue from which shall be used for solid waste
purposes.
(b)  In establishing a schedule of fees, the governing body shall classify the
property within its jurisdiction based upon the character and volume of waste
occurring from the various property uses subject to this part.
(c)  If the governing body makes solid waste facilities available to a public
entity as provided in Section 19-6-505, it shall charge a fee to that public
entity, calculated in the same way as fees assessed on property within the
jurisdiction of the governing body.
(2) (a)  The governing body may impose, assess, and collect a reasonable fee
for each classification of property established and divide the property within
its jurisdiction according to the classifications.
(b)  It may also establish classifications of property for which services may
be provided for no fee or a reduced fee and determine the eligibility
requirements for inclusion in the classifications upon application by property
owners on a case-by-case basis.
(c)  The governing body shall impose and assess the appropriate fee
established for each classification and division of property by ordinance or
resolution, and provide therein for the billing and collection of the fees on
an annual or more frequent basis as it shall determine to be necessary or
appropriate.
(d)  The ordinance or resolution may provide that the fees imposed and
assessed may be billed and collected by the county treasurer as a part of the
regular, ad valorem property tax notice, billing, and collection system of the
county, if it is feasible to do so, unless the public entity imposing and
assessing the fees has an existing service or utility billing and collection
system which can be used for this purpose.
(3)  County treasurers may include the fees certified to them pursuant to this
part on the general, ad valorem tax notice and collect and remit the fees in
the manner and as a part of the tax collection system including the collection
of delinquent fees in the manner provided by law for tax delinquencies.
(4)  Any governing body which uses the general property tax billing and
collection system of a county to bill and collect the fees imposed and
assessed under this part shall reimburse the county for the actual costs
thereof annually, which costs include the materials, equipment, and supplies
used and the labor involved plus a factor added for overhead and general and
administrative expenses.
